Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB492.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7102 of Title 24 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 7102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Digital student identification card." A digital identification, digital wallet, mobile identification or similar application or representation issued by an institution of higher education to identify and authenticate the status or information of a student at the institution of higher education.* * *12345678910111213141516171819 "Physical student identification card." A tangible, nondigital card or document issued by an institution of higher education to identify and authenticate the status or information of a student at the institution of higher education.Section 2. Title 24 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 7103.1. Required suicide prevention and crisis management information.(a) Physical student identification card.--An institution of higher education that issues a physical student identification card to a student of the institution of higher education:(1) Shall print on one side of the physical student identification card "988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline," or the number published under subsection (d)(2), if applicable.(2) May print on one side of the physical student identification card:(i) The National Sexual Assault Hotline. (ii) The National Domestic Violence Hotline.(iii) The Crisis Text Line.(iv) The Veterans Crisis Line.(v) Either of the following regarding the campus at which the student regularly attends classes:(A) The contact information for the campus police department or security office for the campus.(B) If the campus does not have a police department or security office, a local nonemergency police contact.(vi) Either of the following regarding the campus at which the student regularly attends classes:(A) The contact information for the campus health clinic.20250SB0492PN0447 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (B) If the campus does not have a health clinic, the contact information for a local health clinic.(vii) A local or campus-based suicide prevention hotline telephone number, if available.(viii) Any other related contact information, number, website, URL or QR Code deemed necessary or required in the institution of higher education's plan under section 7103 (relating to student mental health and suicide prevention plans).(b) Digital student identification card.--An institution of higher education that issues a digital student identification card to a student of the institution of higher education shall include alongside other student resources on the digital student identification card the information specified under subsection (a)(1).(c) Notice of discontinuance or change.--If either the telephone number identified in subsection (a)(1) is discontinued or the name or dialing code is changed, the Department of Health shall transmit notice of the discontinuance or change to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(d) Annual review and update.--(1) An institution of higher education shall annually review the contact information, names and dialing codes included on the physical student identification cards and with the digital student identification cards to ensure that all contact information, names and dialing codes are accurate and current.(2) Within 30 days of the annual review under paragraph (1), the institution of higher education shall update all 20250SB0492PN0447 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contact information, names and dialing codes that were discontinued or changed since the prior annual review.(3) If the name or dialing code regarding the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline has been discontinued or changed:(i) "988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline" shall not be included on the physical student identification cards and with the digital student identification cards.(ii) The successor name and dialing code regarding suicide prevention and crisis intervention, if any, shall be included on the physical student identification cards and with the digital student identification cards.(4) The discontinuance or change regarding the name or dialing code of the 988 Suicide and Crisis Lifeline shall not affect the remaining provisions or applications under this section.(e) Distribution.--An institution of higher education that does not issue a physical student identification card or digital student identification card shall otherwise distribute to the students of the institution of higher education the information required under this section regarding suicide prevention and crisis intervention.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an institution of higher education to reissue an unexpired physical student identification card or a digital student identification card issued to a student of the institution of higher education prior to the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0492PN0447 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728